Connecticut, session 2026, HB05287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 7-576e of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of [the] this section, no
municipality shall be designated a tier IV municipality, by any means
other than that provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this
section, until April 1, 2018.
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 7-576i of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) The secretary may distribute funds from the Municipal
Restructuring Fund to a third party on behalf of a designated tier II,
[tier] III or [tier] IV municipality. Funds received by a municipality
pursuant to this section may be used, in part, to pay an arbitrator
selected pursuant to clause (v) of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of
section 7-576e.

House Bill No. 5287
Sec. 3. Subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of section 8-13dd of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(8) "Planning region" has the same meaning as provided in section 4-
124i;
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-138 2 of 2